Hawaii statutes.
§657-10 Special limitations. This part
shall not extend to any action which is, or shall be, limited by any statute to
be brought within a shorter time than is herein prescribed; but the action
shall be brought within the time limited by the statute. [CC 1859, §1048; RL
1925, §2647; RL 1935, §3918; RL 1945, §10429; RL 1955, §241-9; HRS §657-10]

Cross References

Wrongful death actions, see §663-3.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next